Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2083.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 5 TLSB 5409YH (5) 91 dg/ko H.F. 2083 Section 1. DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES ââ STATE 1 CHILD CARE ASSISTANCE ââ PAYMENT RATE FOR CHILD CARE PROVIDED 2 TO A FOSTER CHILD. 3 1. For purposes of this section: 4 a. âChild careâ means the same as defined in section 237A.1. 5 b. âChild care assistance programâ means the state child 6 care assistance program established in section 237A.13. 7 c. âFoster childâ means a child receiving child foster care 8 as that term is defined in section 237.1. 9 2. The department shall amend the departmentâs 10 administrative rules pursuant to chapter 17A to require the 11 department to pay for child care provided to a foster child 12 participating in the child care assistance program at the same 13 rate as child care provided to a child with special needs. 14